Arkansas, session 2025, HB1507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-1-1007 is amended to read as follows:
25-1-1007. Exemption from divestment for certain investments.
If an investment is subject to divestment under this subchapter but is
locked into a maturity date and an early divestment would result in a
financial penalty and cause a negative financial impact to the state or a
public entity, then the investment is exempt from divestiture under this
subchapter in order to prevent financial harm to the state or the public
entity and ensure that the fiduciary duty for the state or the public entity
is met.




*ANS254*
02/17/2025 7:33:21 AM ANS254